Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-203
Secretary of State; powers.

In addition to any other powers prescribed by law, the Secretary of State may:

(1) Inspect, with or without the filing of a complaint by any person, and review the practices and procedures of election commissioners, county clerks, their employees, and other election officials in the day-to-day operations of the office, the conduct of primary and general elections, and the registration of qualified electors;

(2) Employ such personnel as necessary to efficiently carry out his or her powers and duties as prescribed in the Election Act;

(3) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations in regard to the registration of voters and the conduct of elections; and

(4) Enforce the act by injunctive action brought by the Attorney General in the district court for the county in which any violation of the act occurs.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 23;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 9.